Idaho, session 2026, H0530.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 18, Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 41-1854, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
41-1854. ANTICANCER MEDICATIONS. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Anticancer medication" means a drug or biologic used to kill,
slow, or prevent the growth of cancerous cells, whether administered
orally, intravenously, or by injection.
(b) "Health benefit plan" shall have the same meaning as provided in
section 41-5903, Idaho Code.
(2) A health benefit plan covering food and drug administration-ap-
proved anticancer medications shall ensure that either:
(a) The copayment, deductible, or coinsurance amount for prescribed
orally administered anticancer medication is not higher than that for
an injected or intravenously administered anticancer medication; or
(b) Out-of-pocket costs to a covered person for an orally administered
anticancer medication do not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250)
per thirty (30) day supply.
(3) A health benefit plan covering an anticancer medication is not re-
quired to classify the anticancer medication as a medical benefit.
(4) A health benefit plan that provides coverage of anticancer medica-
tions shall not be considered in compliance with the provisions of subsec-
tion (2) of this section by:
(a) Increasing the copayment, deductible, or coinsurance amount re-
quired for an anticancer medication covered under the health benefit
plan; or
(b) Reclassifying benefits with respect to anticancer medications.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.